Utah statutes.
63C-7-208.   Property and funds of the Utah Communications Agency Network declared public property -- Exemption from taxes.

(1)  The property and funds of the Utah Communications Agency Network are declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes.

(2)  The property and the Utah Communications Agency Network are exempt from all taxes and special assessments of any public body.  This tax exemption does not apply to any portion of a project used for a profit-making enterprise.



Enacted by Chapter 136, 1997 General Session

